Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-108
Subsequent enactment of criminal laws.

Criminal laws enacted after January 1, 1979, shall be classified for sentencing purposes in accordance with section 28-105 or 28-106.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 8.